Maryland, session 2025, SB0101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
12 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
13 Article – Transportation
14 21–507.
15 (c) In Calvert County, Carroll County, Charles County, Harford County, [and]
16 Washington County, AND WICOMICO COUNTY, a person may not stand in a roadway,
17 median divider, or intersection to solicit money or donations of any kind from the occupant
18 of a vehicle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0101*

2 SENATE BILL 101
1 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
2 October June 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.